New York, session 2025-2026, S6408.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 591 of the labor law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. COVID-19 quarantine. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, 4 any person who is employed by the city of New York or by a hospital 5 within the city of New York whose duties are those of an emergency 6 medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician (as those 7 terms are defined in section three thousand one of the public health 8 law) responding to calls for emergency medical services in the city of 9 New York's 911 system, who is under mandatory or voluntary quarantine as 10 a result of the coronavirus (COVID-19), shall not be deprived of benefit 11 payments by reason of such quarantine. Claimants shall not be required 12 to participate in reemployment services or use vacation time while under 13 quarantine. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10886-01-5